dev/apertium-ne-en.ne.dix
 <!-- Adjectives -->
    <pardef n="थप__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="फटाह__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ठूल/ो-बडा__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा-बडा</l>
          <r>ो-बडा<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="अन्तर/ास्ट्रिय__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्राष्ट्रिय</l>
          <r>ास्ट्रिय<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/बिज्ञान__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>वैज्ञानिक</l>
          <r>बिज्ञान<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="तरुन/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="खडा__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="स/ीधा__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ाधा</l>
          <r>ीधा<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="एकै__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="qnt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="निम्न__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>तम</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>तर</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="टाठ/ोबठो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ाबाठा</l>
          <r>ोबठो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ओटा__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="qnt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="अस/िजिलो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>जिला</l>
          <r>िजिलो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="सुन्दर__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ठूल/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्ठूला</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा-ठूला</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ाठूला</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ठूला</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्-ठूला</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="भोट__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ीनी</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िनी</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="चतुर__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="सान/ो-ठूलो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा-ठूला</l>
          <r>ो-ठूलो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="लाम/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ालामा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="मोट/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ामोटा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा-मोटा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="लाट/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="चोख/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="डर__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>लाग्दो</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="बुढ/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="काल/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="राम्र/ो-नराम्रो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा-नराम्रा</l>
          <r>ो-नराम्रो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="गुरूङ__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>सेनी</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="संसद__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ीय</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="साहित्य__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िक</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="मसिन/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा-मसिना</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="धन__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="विक/ास__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>सित</l>
          <r>ास<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="मो/रो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>टी</l>
          <r>रो<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>रा</l>
          <r>रो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="प्रचल/न__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ित</l>
          <r>न<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="गोरो"><i>गोर</i><par n="बुढ/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रकाशन"><i>प्रकाश</i><par n="प्रचल/न__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="एउटै"><i>एउटै</i><par n="एकै__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="साहित्य"><i>साहित्य</i><par n="साहित्य__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="लङ्गडा"><i>लङ्गडा</i><par n="खडा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="प्यारो"><i>प्यार</i><par n="बुढ/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="जेठो"><i>जेठ</i><par n="बुढ/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="संसद"><i>संसद</i><par n="संसद__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="कायम"><i>कायम</i><par n="थप__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="भनाउँदो"><i>भनाउँद</i><par n="चोख/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="कच्चा"><i>कच्चा</i><par n="खडा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अन्धो"><i>अन्ध</i><par n="तरुन/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="मोरो"><i>मो</i><par n="मो/रो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="फराकिलो"><i>फराकिल</i><par n="लाट/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="जना"><i>जना</i><par n="एकै__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="फटाह"><i>फटाह</i><par n="फटाह__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="चौडो"><i>चौड</i><par n="चोख/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="कल्कलाउँदो"><i>कल्कलाउँद</i><par n="तरुन/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="स्थान"><i>स्थान</i><par n="संसद__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="राम्रो-नराम्रो"><i>राम्र</i><par n="राम्र/ो-नराम्रो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="कमार"><i>कमार</i><par n="फटाह__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="विभिन्न"><i>विभिन्न</i><par n="खडा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="टाठोबठो"><i>टाठ</i><par n="टाठ/ोबठो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अनेक"><i>अनेक</i><par n="थप__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रचलन"><i>प्रचल</i><par n="प्रचल/न__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="विकास"><i>विक</i><par n="विक/ास__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="बुढो"><i>बुढ</i><par n="बुढ/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="दुहुनो"><i>दुहुन</i><par n="चोख/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="एकै"><i>एकै</i><par n="एकै__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="फोस्रो"><i>फोस्र</i><par n="लाट/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="एकोहोरो"><i>एकोहोर</i><par n="काल/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="उचित"><i>उचित</i><par n="थप__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="खडा"><i>खडा</i><par n="खडा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="लामो"><i>लाम</i><par n="लाम/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="बूढो"><i>बूढ</i><par n="काल/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="कुमार"><i>कुमार</i><par n="फटाह__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="कालो"><i>काल</i><par n="काल/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="माहिलो"><i>माहिल</i><par n="काल/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="स्वादिलो"><i>स्वादिल</i><par n="लाट/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="वर्तमान"><i>वर्तमान</i><par n="थप__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="गोज्याङ्ग्रो"><i>गोज्याङ्ग्र</i><par n="तरुन/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="झुत्रो"><i>झुत्र</i><par n="चोख/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="धन"><i>धन</i><par n="धन__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="चतुर"><i>चतुर</i><par n="चतुर__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="निम्न"><i>निम्न</i><par n="निम्न__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ठूलो-बडा"><i>ठूल</i><par n="ठूल/ो-बडा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="बाठो"><i>बाठ</i><par n="लाट/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="छुच्चो"><i>छुच्च</i><par n="तरुन/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="कमजोर"><i>कमजोर</i><par n="खडा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रत्येक"><i>प्रत्येक</i><par n="खडा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="बाटुलो"><i>बाटुल</i><par n="चोख/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="हरेक"><i>हरेक</i><par n="थप__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अन्तरास्ट्रिय"><i>अन्तर</i><par n="अन्तर/ास्ट्रिय__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="डर"><i>डर</i><par n="डर__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="उज्यालो"><i>उज्याल</i><par n="काल/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="दुवै"><i>दुवै</i><par n="एकै__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="काहिलो"><i>काहिल</i><par n="तरुन/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="सीधा"><i>स</i><par n="स/ीधा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ठूलो"><i>ठूल</i><par n="ठूल/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="रमाइलो"><i>रमाइल</i><par n="लाट/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="असिजिलो"><i>अस</i><par n="अस/िजिलो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="बिज्ञान"><i></i><par n="/बिज्ञान__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अन्य"><i>अन्य</i><par n="एकै__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="कान्छो"><i>कान्छ</i><par n="बुढ/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="मसिनो"><i>मसिन</i><par n="मसिन/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="घिनलाग्दो"><i>घिनलाग्द</i><par n="तरुन/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="मोटो"><i>मोट</i><par n="मोट/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="भोट"><i>भोट</i><par n="भोट__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रथम"><i>प्रथम</i><par n="एकै__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ओटा"><i>ओटा</i><par n="ओटा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="सानो-ठूलो"><i>सान</i><par n="सान/ो-ठूलो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="उपयुक्त"><i>उपयुक्त</i><par n="थप__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="सुन्दर"><i>सुन्दर</i><par n="सुन्दर__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="गुरूङ"><i>गुरूङ</i><par n="गुरूङ__adj"/></e>
